District of Columbia statutes.
32-1544

Severability.

Should a court of competent jurisdiction declare any provision of this chapter to be unconstitutional or beyond the authority of the Council of the District of Columbia, such declaration shall have no effect upon any other provision of this chapter.

History

July 1, 1980, D.C. Law 3-77, § 45, 27 DCR 2503

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-344.